Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5682.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 43530. (1) The department may contract with a sportsmen's organization to annually auction to the highest bidders up to 5 director's hunt licenses. Any individual may bid on a license under this subsection. (2) Any sportsmen's organization authorized by the department to auction a license under subsection (1) may retain up to 7.5% of the money raised by the auction at a rate determined by the department. The remainder of the money received from the auction under subsection (1) must be deposited with the state treasurer to the credit of the game and fish protection account. (3) The department or commission, as appropriate, shall issue any orders necessary to implement this section under section 40107 or 40113a. (4) As used in this section: (a) "Director's hunt license" includes all of the following: (i) An elk hunting license. (ii) A bear hunting license. (iii) A spring and fall turkey hunting license. (iv) An antlerless deer hunting license. (v) The first pick at a managed waterfowl hunt area. (b) "Sportsmen's organization" means a nonprofit organization that is exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) or (4) of the internal revenue code, 26 USC 501, regardless of whether the organization is a chapter of or affiliated with a state or national organization, that is organized for the purpose of conservation of natural resources and the preservation or advancement of hunting, fishing, or outdoor recreation.